District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.06

Employee right of action.

An employee or employees injured by a violation of this chapter shall be entitled to maintain an administrative action or a civil action.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 7, 61 DCR 11368